North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 23B. Fishermen’s Economic Development Program.

§ 113-315.15.
Short title.

This Article shall be known as the Fishermen’s Economic Development Act.

History.

1973, c. 618, s. 1.

§ 113-315.16.
Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that the fishermen of North Carolina perform essential functions in providing wholesome food for the diets of the citizens of North Carolina, that they properly earn a livelihood by performing these essential functions, that they are entitled to the same or similar governmental services provided other segments of our society so as to become more proficient in the performance of these essential functions, and that the quality of life for North Carolinians is enhanced by the economic development of the fishing industry.

History.

1973, c. 618, s. 1.

§ 113-315.17.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Economic development” means: giving helpful and useful aid to improve the proficiency of the citizens, and the efficiency of the operations are improved to the end that the economic well-being of fishermen is improved, the quality of life is enhanced and equality of opportunity is provided.

“Fisherman” means: any person, firm, corporation, cooperative, partnership, or any legally constituted group, engaged in the harvesting, handling, processing, packaging, and marketing of fishery or seafood products from coastal fishing waters as defined by

G.S. 113-129

.

History.

1973, c. 618, s. 1.

§ 113-315.18.
Fishermen’s Economic Development Program.

The Secretary is hereby authorized to provide through his Department and the extension services of the University of North Carolina those services intended to promote the economic development of the fishermen, including but not limited to:

Instituting business management services to promote better business management practices throughout the fishing and seafood industry, and to promote the better use of credit and other business management techniques.

Providing counseling services to the fishermen at all levels and assisting them in meeting the federal and State environmental, safety and health requirements.

Improving waterways, harbors, inlets, and generally the water transportation system of North Carolina so as to more efficiently and safely accommodate commercial and sport fishing craft, and to provide access to and from fishing grounds.

History.

1973, c. 618, s. 1; c. 1262, s. 28; 1975, c. 19, s. 36; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 116.

§ 113-315.19.
Personnel needs.

To effectively carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth above, the Secretary may employ or contract with the extension services of the University of North Carolina to employ the following persons:

A person to have responsibility for the successful execution of the program and to coordinate as deemed desirable with other agencies of the State and federal government,

A business management specialist,

An insurance and finance specialist,

A specialist who could understand, interpret, and counsel on regulations and requirements,

A specialist in waterways, and water transportation, and

Such clerical personnel as necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article.

History.

1973, c. 618, s. 1.

§§ 113-315.20 through 113-315.24.

Reserved for future codification purposes.